District of Columbia statutes.
44-206

Mayor’s authority to establish Laboratory Advisory Board.

(a)

The Mayor shall appoint a Laboratory Advisory Board, which will advise the Mayor on:

(1)

Classifying laboratory tests as waived, moderately complex, or highly complex for the purposes of this chapter;

(2)

Developing additional requirements or limitations for clinical laboratories;

(3)

Proficiency testing programs and certifying institutions and organizations for the purposes of this chapter; and

(4)

Developing rules and procedures for inspections of laboratories.

(b)

The Mayor shall appoint the members of the Board within 60 days of March 16, 1989.

(c)

The Board shall transmit its written recommendations to the Mayor within 180 days of the date of the appointment of all members and shall then cease to exist.

(d)

The Mayor may appoint a temporary board, at the Mayor’s discretion, for whatever periods of the time the Mayor deems necessary because of advancements in technology or other purposes consistent with carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-182, § 7, 35 DCR 7718
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 5012(f), 52 DCR 7503

Section References

This section is referenced in § 44-201.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1506.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-33 rewrote subsecs. (a)(1) and (a)(2).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5012(f) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).